Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Sewage Disposal.
§ 32.1-164.1:01.
Onsite Sewage Indemnification Fund.

There is hereby created the Onsite Sewage Indemnification Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund,” whose purpose is to receive moneys generated by a portion of the fees collected by the Department of Health pursuant to subsections C and E of §

32.1-164

and appropriated by the Commonwealth for the purpose of assisting any Virginia real property owner holding a valid permit to operate an onsite sewage system when such system or components thereof fail within three years of construction and such failure results from the negligence of the Department of Health. The Fund may also be used, in the discretion of the Board, to support the program for training and recognition of licensed onsite soil evaluators and to provide grants and loans to property owners with income at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines to repair failing onsite sewage systems or install onsite sewage systems on properties that lack adequate sewage disposal. No expenses shall be paid from the Fund to support the program for training and recognition of onsite soil evaluators, or to provide any grant or loan to repair a failing onsite sewage system or install an onsite sewage system on any property that lacks adequate sewage disposal, in lieu of payment to any owner or owners qualified to receive payment from the Fund pursuant to this chapter.

Ten dollars of each fee collected by the Department of Health pursuant to subsections C and E of §

32.1-164

shall be deposited by the Comptroller in the Fund to be appropriated for the purposes of this section to the Department of Health by the General Assembly as it deems necessary.

The owner of an onsite sewage system that has been permitted by the Department of Health may cause, by filing a request for payment from the Fund within one year from the date the system or components thereof failed, the Commissioner to review the circumstances of the onsite sewage system failure, if the onsite sewage system has failed within three years of construction. Upon the Commissioner’s finding that the onsite sewage system was permitted by the Department and (i) the system or components thereof failed within three years of construction; (ii) that specific actions of the Department were negligent and that those actions caused the failure; and (iii) that the owner filed a request for payment from the Fund within one year from the date the system or components thereof failed, the Commissioner shall, subject to the limitations stated herein, reimburse the owner for the reasonable cost of following the Board’s regulations to repair or replace the failed onsite sewage system or components thereof.

Prior to receiving payment from the Fund, the owner shall follow the requirements in the Board’s regulations to repair or replace the failed onsite sewage system or components thereof.

The total amount an owner may receive in payment from the Fund shall not exceed $30,000. Only the costs of the system that failed or the costs of labor and equipment required to repair or replace the failed onsite sewage system or components thereof are reimbursable by the Fund.

If the Commissioner finds that the system was permitted by the Department and has failed within three years of construction and that the failure resulted from faulty construction or other private party error, the Commissioner may assist the owner of the failed system in seeking redress from the system’s builder or other private party.

Every request for payment from the Fund shall be forever barred unless the owner has filed a complete application as required by the Department. The request shall be filed with the Commissioner within one year from the date that the onsite sewage system or components thereof first failed. However, if the owner was under a disability at the time the cause of action accrued, the tolling provisions of §

8.01-229

shall apply. The owner shall mail the request for payment from the Fund via the United States Postal Service by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the Commissioner.In any action contesting the filing of the request for payment from the Fund, the burden of proof shall be on the owner to establish mailing and receipt of the notice in conformity with this section. The signed receipt indicating delivery to the Commissioner, when admitted into evidence, shall be prima facie evidence of filing of the request for payment from the Fund under this section. The request for payment from the Fund shall be deemed to be timely filed if it is sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, and if the official receipt shows that the mailing was within the prescribed time limits.Notwithstanding any provision of this article, the liability for any payment from the Fund shall be conditioned upon the execution by the owner of a release approved by the Attorney General of all claims against the Commonwealth, its political subdivisions, agencies, and instrumentalities and against any officer or employee of the Commonwealth in connection with or arising out of the occurrence complained of.

The Commissioner and the Attorney General shall cooperatively develop an actuarially sound program and policy for identifying, evaluating, and processing requests for payment from the Fund.

If the Commissioner refuses the request for payment from the Fund, the owner may appeal the refusal to the State Health Department Sewage Handling and Disposal Appeal Review Board.The Board may promulgate regulations pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) for the administration of the Fund consistent with this chapter.In the event the Fund is insufficient to meet requests for payment from the Fund, this section and the creation of the Fund shall not be construed to provide liability on the part of the Department or any of its personnel where no such liability existed prior to July 1, 1994.

History.

1994, c. 747; 2007, cc. 448, 515; 2016, c. 90; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 382.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 448, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commissioner shall, at the end of each fiscal year, certify that no expenses were paid from the fund to support the program for training and recognition of authorized onsite soil evaluators in lieu of payment to any owner or owners qualified to receive payment from the fund pursuant to this chapter.”

Acts 2007, c. 515, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to all requests for payment from the fund beginning with those before the Commissioner on July 1, 2007. Owners with requests for payment from the fund before the Commissioner on or after July 1, 2007, shall repair or replace the onsite sewage system or components thereof before receiving reimbursement from the fund.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 448 made a minor stylistic change to the catchline.

The 2007 amendment by c. 515 rewrote the section.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 90 substituted “licensed onsite soil evaluators” for “authorized onsite soil evaluators” in subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 382, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, inserted “hereafter referred to as ‘the Fund”’ and added “and to provide grants and loans to property owners with income at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines to repair failing onsite sewage systems or install onsite sewage systems on properties that lack adequate sewage disposal. No expenses shall be paid from the Fund to support the program for training and recognition of onsite soil evaluators, or to provide any grant or loan to repair a failing onsite sewage system or install an onsite sewage system on any property that lacks adequate sewage disposal, in lieu of payment to any owner or owners qualified to receive payment from the Fund pursuant to this chapter”; substituted “in the Fund” for “to this fund” in subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

§ 32.1-164.1:1.
Validity of certain septic tank permits.

Any septic tank permit issued shall be valid for a period of 18 months from the date of issuance unless there has been a substantial, intervening change in the soil or site conditions where the septic system is to be located. However, if a building permit has been obtained or building construction has commenced, the permit may be extended for an additional 18 months. Applicants shall be informed of the septic tank permit validity period and advised to apply only when ready to begin construction.

Further, whenever any onsite sewage system is failing, or an owner has elected to voluntarily upgrade an onsite sewage system pursuant to §

32.1-164.1:3

, and it is on or serves real property consisting of not less than one nor more than four dwelling units and the Board’s regulations impose (i) a requirement for treatment beyond the level of treatment provided by the existing onsite sewage system when operating properly or (ii) a new requirement for pressure dosing, the owner may request a waiver from such requirements. The Commissioner shall grant any request for such waiver, unless he finds that the system was installed illegally without a permit. Any such waivers shall be recorded in the land records of the clerk of the circuit court in the jurisdiction in which the property on which the relevant onsite sewage system is located. Except as provided in subsection C, waivers granted hereunder shall not be transferable and shall be null and void upon transfer or sale of the property on which the onsite sewage system is located. Additional treatment or pressure dosing requirements shall be imposed in such instances when the property is transferred or sold.Any owner who (a) obtained a waiver to repair a failing onsite sewage system pursuant to this subsection on or between July 1, 2004, and December 6, 2011, (b) completed such repair, and (c) voluntarily upgrades the system may request, and shall receive, a voluntary upgrade waiver in accordance with this section and §

32.1-164.1:3

. Any such waiver shall be recorded in the land records of the clerk of the circuit court in the jurisdiction where the onsite sewage system is located and shall supersede any prior waiver recorded pursuant to this section.The owner of the relevant property shall disclose, in accordance with subsection D, that any operating permit for the onsite sewage system that has been granted a waiver authorized by this subsection shall be null and void at the time of transfer or sale of the property and that the Board’s regulatory requirements for additional treatment or pressure dosing shall be required before an operating permit may be reinstated.The provisions of this subsection shall apply only with respect to transfers by sale, exchange, installment land sales contract, or lease with option to buy residential real property consisting of not less than one nor more than four dwelling units, whether or not the transaction is with the assistance of a licensed real estate broker or salesperson.

The following are specifically allowed under the provisions of subsection B:

Transfers pursuant to court order including, but not limited to, transfers ordered by a court in administration of an estate, transfers pursuant to a writ of execution, transfers by foreclosure sale, transfers by a trustee in bankruptcy, transfers by eminent domain, and transfers resulting from a decree for specific performance.

Transfers to a beneficiary of a deed of trust by a trustor or successor in interest who is in default, transfers by a trustee under a deed of trust pursuant to a foreclosure, or transfers by a beneficiary under a deed of trust who has acquired the real property at a sale conducted pursuant to a foreclosure sale under a deed of trust or has acquired the real property by deed in lieu of foreclosure.

Transfers not for value by a fiduciary in the course of the administration of a decedent’s estate, guardianship, conservatorship, or trust.

Transfers between spouses resulting from a decree of divorce or a property settlement stipulation pursuant to the provisions of Title 20.

Transfers to or from any governmental entity or public or quasi-public housing authority or agency.

Transfers pursuant to real estate purchase contracts where the owner has obtained a permit to voluntarily upgrade an onsite sewage system pursuant to §

32.1-164.1:3

.

Other transfers consistent with criteria established by the Board of Health and the Real Estate Board.

The owner of residential real property subject to subsection B shall deliver to the purchaser a written disclosure prior to the acceptance of a real estate purchase contract. The written disclosure statement shall be in a separate document, developed by the Real Estate Board on or before January 1, 2006. Prior to that time, it shall be the obligation of the owner of such residential real property to prepare the written disclosure statement and provide it to the purchaser as otherwise provided herein.

If the disclosure required by subsection B is delivered to the purchaser after the acceptance of the real estate purchase contract, the purchaser’s sole remedy shall be to terminate the real estate purchase contract at or prior to the earliest of the following: (i) three days after delivery of the disclosure in person; (ii) five days after the postmark if the disclosure is deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, and properly addressed to the purchaser; (iii) settlement upon purchase of the property; (iv) occupancy of the property by the purchaser; (v) the execution by the purchaser of a written waiver of the purchaser’s right of termination under this chapter contained in a writing separate from the real estate purchase contract; or (vi) the purchaser making written application to a lender for a mortgage loan where such application contains a disclosure that the right of termination shall end upon the application for the mortgage loan.In order to terminate a real estate purchase contract when permitted by this subsection, the purchaser shall, within the time required by this chapter, give written notice to the owner either by hand delivery or by United States mail, postage prepaid, and properly addressed to the owner. If the purchaser terminates a real estate purchase contract in compliance with this chapter, the termination shall be without penalty to the purchaser, and any deposit shall be promptly returned to the purchaser. Any rights of the purchaser to terminate the contract provided by this chapter shall end if not exercised prior to the earlier of (i) the making of a written application to a lender for a mortgage loan where the application contains a disclosure that the right of termination shall end upon the application for the mortgage loan or (ii) settlement or occupancy by the purchaser, in the event of a sale, or occupancy, or in the event of a lease with option to purchase.

A real estate licensee representing an owner of residential real property as the listing broker shall have a duty to inform each such owner represented by that licensee of the owner’s rights and obligations under subsection B. A real estate licensee representing a purchaser of residential real property or, if the purchaser is not represented by a licensee, the real estate licensee representing an owner of residential real estate and dealing with the purchaser shall have a duty to inform each such purchaser of the purchaser’s rights and obligations under subsection B. Provided a real estate licensee performs those duties, the licensee shall have no further duties to the parties to a residential real estate transaction under this section, and shall not be liable to any party to a residential real estate transaction for a violation of subsection B or for any failure to disclose any information regarding any real property subject to subsection B.

For the purposes of this section:“Acceptance” means the full execution of a real estate purchase contract by all parties.“Real estate purchase contract” means a contract for the sale, exchange, or lease with option to buy of real estate subject to this section.

The Real Estate Board shall enforce subsections D, E, and F pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 21 of Title 54.1 (§ 54.1-2100 et seq.).

History.

1984, c. 401; 1986, c. 331; 1994, c. 747; 2004, c. 916; 2005, c. 469; 2011, c. 394; 2015, c. 111.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 916 added the subsection A designation; substituted “18 months” for “eighteen months” twice in subsection A; and added subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 469, in the first paragraph of subsection B, inserted “and is on or serves real property consisting of not less than one nor more than four dwelling units” in the first sentence and substituted “as provided in subsection C” for “between a husband and a wife” in the fourth sentence, substituted “accordance with subsection D” for “writing, to any and all potential purchasers or mortgage holders” in the second paragraph and added the third paragraph; and added subsections C through H.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 394, effective March 23, 2011, in the first paragraph in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “or an owner has elected to voluntarily upgrade an onsite sewage system pursuant to §

32.1-164.1:3

” and “it,” and deleted “for repairing such failing system” following “Board’s regulations,” and in the second sentence, deleted “failing” preceding “system”; added subdivision C 6; and made a minor stylistic change in subsection G.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 111 added the second paragraph in subsection B.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-401 Land Sales Contract. No. 16-404. Virginia Bar Association Residential Contract of Purchase. No. 16-421 Contract Clause as to Soil Study Contingency. No. 16-474 Disclosure Regarding Validity of Septic System Operating Permit. No. 16-474.1 Preprinted Disclosure Regarding Validity of Septic System Operating Permit. No. 16-485 Private Well and Septic Systems.

§ 32.1-164.1:2.
Eligibility for betterment loans to repair or replace failing onsite sewage systems.

The Board shall establish a betterment loan eligibility program to assist owners with the repair, replacement, or upgrade of failing or noncompliant onsite sewage systems, and the Board may identify sources for betterment loans to be provided by private lenders, directly or through conduit lenders. In addition, owners may also apply to the Department for betterment loan eligibility to upgrade an onsite or alternative discharging sewage system that is not failing, provided such upgrade is for the purposes of reducing threats to public health, and ground and surface waters, including the reduction of nitrogen discharges.

Upon determination by the Department that the owner has one or more onsite sewage systems that are out of compliance with those regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, or in need of repair or replacement, the owner shall follow the requirements in the Board’s regulations to initiate the repair or replacement of such systems. If the owner desires to be qualified by the Department to receive a betterment loan, at any time before the repair or replacement is completed, he shall provide the Department with an estimate of the approximate cost of such remedial work, which the Department shall accept. The issuance of a permit by the Department to repair or replace an onsite sewage system, combined with an estimate provided by the owner to the Department, shall demonstrate eligibility for a betterment loan. Upon a determination of eligibility, the Department shall notify the owner in writing. If the Department refuses the request for an eligibility letter, the owner may appeal the refusal to the State Health Department Sewage Handling and Disposal Appeal Review Board. It shall be the sole responsibility of the owner to secure the betterment loan from or through a private lender. Local health departments may provide a list of lenders available for this purpose. Nothing in this section shall be construed as allowing construction or modification of an onsite or alternative discharging sewage system without a permit issued by the Department.

Betterment loans made pursuant to this section shall be recorded in the deed book of the circuit court clerk’s office for the locality in which the land is located and an abstract of the loan and betterment loan eligibility letter issued by the Department shall be indexed in the name of the owner. Betterment loans made pursuant to this section may be recorded in increments by the private lender as the repair or replacement of the onsite sewage system is completed, provided that in no event shall the total amount recorded exceed the estimate provided to the Department, without the Department approving an amendment to the repair permit, and issuing a revised betterment loan eligibility letter. The Department may, subject to appropriate waivers for economic hardship, charge the owner a fee not to exceed $50 for each betterment loan eligibility letter request made by an owner. The Department may require that the owner or private lender provide the Department with proof that any betterment loan has been recorded in the deed book of the circuit court clerk’s office for the locality in which the land is located.The incurrence of a betterment loan pursuant to this section shall not be considered a breach of limitation or prohibition contained in a note, mortgage or contract on the transfer of an interest in the owner’s property.

Where agreeable to the private lender and the conduit lender, if any, a locality may act as the collection agent for the payments made by the owner on a betterment loan. Any such payments collected by the locality shall be deemed to be held in trust by the locality for benefit of the private lender and conduit issuer, if any. The locality may receive a fee payable by the private lender or conduit loan provider, if any, for such service not to exceed one-eighth of one percent of the payments collected.

History.

2009, c. 829.

§ 32.1-164.1:3.
Permits for voluntary system upgrades.

Any owner desiring to voluntarily upgrade an onsite or alternative discharging sewage system that is not failing shall file an application, according to instructions from the Board, to obtain a construction permit to improve the system in accordance with the laws and regulations of the Board for repairing failing systems, provided such upgrade is for the purposes of reducing threats to the public health, or to ground and surface waters, including the reduction of nitrogen discharges.

The Department shall attach a statement to any permit issued pursuant to this section clearly stating that the upgrades specified in the permit are voluntary and not required by law. The Department may require the owner to indemnify and hold harmless the Department prior to the issuance of any such permit. Any permits issued pursuant to this section shall be subject to the provisions of §

32.1-164.1:1

.

History.

2011, c. 394.

Effective date.

Acts 2011, c. 394, cl. 2, makes this section effective March 23, 2011.

§§ 32.1-164.2 through 32.1-164.7.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 881 and 929, cl. 8, effective January 1, 2008.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 881 and 929, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2008, and shall not become effective unless adequate funds have been appropriated to administer the program and adequate positions have been authorized by this date.” Funding was appropriated. See Item 362 G of Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3, as amended by Acts 2007, c. 847.

Acts 2007, cc. 881 and 929, cl. 3 provides: “That any person previously certified as a sewage sludge land applicator pursuant to § 32.1-164.6 of the Code of Virginia as repealed by this act shall be deemed to be certified under this act until such certification expires or is revoked by the State Water Control Board.”

Acts 2007, cc. 881 and 929, cl. 4 provides: “That any permit, certificate, or authorization for the land application, marketing, or distribution of sewage sludge issued prior to January 1, 2008, shall remain in effect for the remainder of the term specified in such permit, certificate, or authorization unless amended or revoked by the Board.”

Acts 2007, cc. 881 and 929, cl. 5 provides: “That the State Board of Health’s Biosolids Use Regulations (12 VAC 5-585) shall be transferred from the State Board of Health to the State Water Control Board on January 1, 2008, and the State Water Control Board’s initial rulemaking to implement this act shall be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) of the Administrative Process Act. Such regulations that are in effect shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the State Water Control Board.”

Acts 2007, cc. 881 and 929, cl. 6 provides: “That, upon the effective date of this act [January 1, 2008], the administration and management of the Sludge Management Fund and the moneys in the Fund shall be transferred to the Department of Environmental Quality.”

§ 32.1-164.8.
Onsite Operation and Maintenance Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Onsite Operation and Maintenance Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All fees collected pursuant to subsection H of §

32.1-164

shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of supporting the operation and maintenance of onsite systems, including but not limited to (i) training operators and (ii) supporting the reporting system required by subsection H of §

32.1-164

. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by Commissioner.

History.

2007, c. 892.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 892, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2009, except the provisions of § 54.1-2301, which shall become effective in due course.”

§ 32.1-164.9.
Regulations for chamber and bundled expanded polystyrene effluent distribution systems for onsite sewage systems.

The Board of Health shall promulgate regulations for chamber and bundled expanded polystyrene effluent distribution systems for onsite sewage systems permitted by the Commissioner pursuant to Article 1 (§

32.1-164

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 32.1. Such regulations shall include requirements for chamber and bundled expanded polystyrene effluent distribution systems for onsite sewage systems, which shall include (i) specifications for the physical construction of chamber and bundled expanded polystyrene effluent distribution systems including minimum exterior width, height, effluent storage capacity, and structural capacity; (ii) requirements for a permeable interface between chamber and bundled expanded polystyrene effluent distribution systems and trench sidewall soil surfaces for the absorption of wastewater; (iii) criteria for the allowable slope, maximum length, minimum sidewall depth, and minimum lateral separation of chamber and bundled expanded polystyrene effluent distribution system absorption trenches; (iv) criteria for substituting chamber and bundled expanded polystyrene effluent distribution systems for gravity percolation trenches and gravel and crushed stone low pressure systems; (v) criteria for determining the minimum area requirements for chamber and bundled expanded polystyrene effluent distribution system absorption trenches; and (vi) such other requirements pertaining to the promulgation of chamber and bundled expanded polystyrene effluent distribution system regulations for onsite sewage systems as may be deemed necessary by the Board.

History.

2013, c. 202.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 202, cl. 1, was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2013, c. 202, cl. 2 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [March 12, 2013].”

Acts 2013, c. 202, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2013, c. 202, cl. 4 provides: “That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations for other effluent distribution system technologies for onsite sewage systems as may be deemed necessary by the Board.”

§ 32.1-165.
Prior approval required before issuance of building permit; approved sewage system or nonconforming system.

No county, city, town, or employee thereof shall issue a permit for a building designed for human occupancy without the prior written authorization of the Commissioner or his agent. The Commissioner or his agent shall authorize the issuance of such permit upon finding that safe, adequate, and proper sewage treatment is or will be made available to such building, or upon finding that the issuance of such permit has been approved by the Review Board. “Safe, adequate, and proper” means a treatment works that complies with applicable regulations of the Board of Health that are in effect at the time of application.

The Commissioner shall develop an application and procedure for evaluating an installed treatment works and to determine whether to authorize issuance of a permit for a building designed for human occupancy.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the Commissioner or his agent from approving the use of a nonconforming treatment works, provided the treatment works was installed in accordance with the Board of Health’s applicable regulations in effect at the time of its installation, is not failing, and is designed and constructed for the sewage flow and strength expected from the building.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an owner of real property from receiving a voluntary upgrade pursuant to §

32.1-164.1:3

, or other permit, as a condition of approval as a nonconforming treatment works.

The Board, Commissioner, and Department may accept a certified evaluation from (i) a professional engineer licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 of Title 54.1; (ii) an onsite soil evaluator, onsite sewage system operator, or onsite sewage system installer licensed pursuant to Chapter 23 of Title 54.1; (iii) or other individual with an appropriate certification from the National Sanitation Foundation, or equivalent. The Department may perform an inspection of the certified evaluation but shall not be required to perform a field check prior to the issuance of the written authorization in subsection A.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-9; 1954, c. 646; 1964, c. 436; 1970, c. 645; 1972, c. 775; 1979, c. 711; 1984, c. 457; 2016, c. 96.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 96 inserted the subsection A designation and added subsections B through E; in subsection A, deleted “his” following “of such permit upon” and substituted “such permit” for “said permit” in the second sentence, and added the third sentence.

§ 32.1-166.
Agreements with federal agencies.

The Board may enter into an agreement with any appropriate federal agency to regulate and monitor the collection, transportation, conveyance, treatment and disposal of sewage from common carriers or at federal facilities pursuant to the Public Health Service Act, United States Public Law 78-410, and any other applicable federal law.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-9; 1954, c. 646; 1964, c. 436; 1970, c. 645; 1972, c. 775; 1979, c. 711.